Nevada, session 83, SB81.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 385A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Department shall, to the extent that money is available
for that purpose, create and conduct at each school in a school
district and at each charter school in this State:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
(a) In a school year which begins in an odd-numbered
calendar year, a survey administered to persons employed at the
school, measuring the school climate.
(b) In a school year which begins in an even-numbered
calendar year, a survey administered to persons employed at the
school, measuring working conditions in the school.
(c) On an ongoing basis, a survey administered to persons who
are leaving their employment at the school, including, without
limitation, through retirement, transfer or resignation.
2. A school district or charter school shall use the results of
surveys conducted pursuant to this section to assess and improve:
(a) Strategies for the retention of staff; and
(b) The school climate and working conditions at schools
within the school district or at the charter school, as applicable.
3. Data collected from a survey conducted pursuant to this
section must not be used in the evaluation of any:
(a) School district or school as part of the statewide system of
accountability set forth in NRS 385A.600 to 385A.840, inclusive;
or
(b) Teacher, administrator or other licensed educational
personnel conducted pursuant to NRS 391.650 to 391.730,
inclusive.
4. The Department shall include in the statewide system of
accountability set forth in NRS 385A.600 to 385A.840, inclusive,
recognition of public schools at which the rate of response to a
survey administered pursuant to this section is at least 85 percent.
5. The Department shall annually submit to the Commission
on School Funding created pursuant to NRS 387.1246 and the
State Board a report of the data collected from a survey conducted
pursuant to this section.
6. The Department may, to the extent that money is available
for that purpose, contract with a qualified vendor to carry out the
provisions of this section.
7. As used in this section, “school climate” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 385A.650.
Sec. 2. NRS 385A.650 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.650 1. The principal of each school, including, without
limitation, each charter school, shall, in consultation with the
employees of the school, prepare a plan to improve the achievement
of the pupils enrolled in the school.
2. The plan developed pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Include any information prescribed by regulation of the State
Board;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(b) Be developed in accordance with the provisions of
NRS 388.885;
(c) Be informed by the results of the surveys conducted
pursuant to section 1 of this act;
(d) Include, without limitation, methods for evaluating and
improving the school climate in the school; and
[(d)] (e) Comply with the provisions of 20 U.S.C. § 6311(d).
3. The principal of each school shall, in consultation with the
employees of the school:
(a) Review the plan prepared pursuant to this section annually to
evaluate the effectiveness of the plan; and
(b) Based upon the evaluation of the plan, make revisions, as
necessary, to ensure that the plan is designed to improve the
academic achievement of pupils enrolled in the school.
4. On or before the date prescribed by the Department, the
principal of each school shall submit the plan or the revised plan, as
applicable, to the:
(a) Department;
(b) Committee;
(c) Bureau; and
(d) Board of trustees of the school district in which the school is
located or, if the school is a charter school, the sponsor of the
charter school and the governing body of the charter school.
5. As used in this section, “school climate” means the basis of
which to measure the relationships between pupils and the parents
or legal guardians of pupils and educational personnel, the cultural
and linguistic competence of instructional materials and educational
personnel, the emotional and physical safety of pupils and
educational personnel and the social, emotional and academic
development of pupils and educational personnel.
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4. NRS 387.1213 is hereby amended to read as follows:
387.1213 1. The Education Stabilization Account is hereby
created in the State Education Fund. Except as otherwise provided
in this section, each year after the close of the previous fiscal year
and before the [issuance of the State Controller’s annual report,]
close of the then current fiscal year, each county school district
shall transfer from the county school district fund to the Education
Stabilization Account any amount by which the actual ending fund
balance of the county school district fund exceeds 16.6 percent of
the total actual expenditures for the fund. The interest and income
earned on the money in the Account, after deducting any applicable
charges, must be credited to the Account.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
2. Money transferred pursuant to subsection 1 to the Education
Stabilization Account is a continuing appropriation solely for the
purpose of authorizing the expenditure of the transferred money for
the purposes set forth in this section.
3. The balance in the Education Stabilization Account must not
exceed 20 percent of the total of all appropriations and
authorizations from the State Education Fund, excluding the
Education Stabilization Account, for the immediately preceding
fiscal year. Any money transferred to the Education Stabilization
Account which exceeds this amount must instead be transferred to
the State Education Fund.
4. If the Interim Finance Committee finds that:
(a) Upon submission of a request from the Department, the
actual enrollment growth for a fiscal year exceeds the projected
enrollment growth by an amount that the Interim Finance
Committee determines would make a transfer of money to the State
Education Fund necessary to fund the excess enrollment;
(b) The collection of revenue in any fiscal year will result in the
State Education Fund receiving less money than authorized for
expenditure from the State Education Fund;
(c) Upon submission of a request from the Department, any
amount of money which was deposited in the State Education Fund
is found by an audit to have been deposited in error; or
(d) Upon submission of a request from the Department, any
error in the application of the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan by the
Department has created a shortfall in the State Education Fund,
 the Committee shall by resolution establish an amount of money
to transfer from the Education Stabilization Account to the State
Education Fund and direct the State Controller to transfer that
amount to the State Education Fund. The State Controller shall
thereupon make the transfer.
5. When determining the actual ending fund balance for the
purposes of subsection 1, each county school district shall exclude:
(a) Any money deposited in the county school district fund on or
before June 30, 2020;
(b) Any money apportioned to the county school district for
capital projects or debt service pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS
362.170 and deposited in the county school district fund when
authorized by law; and
(c) Any money transferred to the county school district and
authorized for expenditure as a continuing appropriation pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 6 of NRS 387.1214.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
6. If the Superintendent of Public Instruction determines that
the money due from the State Education Fund to a county school
district, charter school or university school for profoundly gifted
pupils pursuant to NRS 387.185 exceeds the amount of money
available in the State Education Fund because of a delay in expected
receipts, he or she may request from the Director of the Office of
Finance a temporary advance from the Education Stabilization
Account for the payment of such money due. Upon receipt of such a
request, the Director of the Office of Finance shall make a
recommendation to the Interim Finance Committee to approve the
temporary advance in whole or in part or to deny the request. If the
Interim Finance Committee approves the request in whole or in part,
the Director of the Office of Finance shall notify the State Controller
and the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative Counsel Bureau
of the amount approved by the Interim Finance Committee, and the
State Controller shall draw his or her warrant upon receipt of such a
notice of approval. Any money which is temporarily advanced from
the Education Stabilization Account pursuant to this subsection
must be repaid by August 31 following the end of the fiscal year in
which the temporary advance is made.
7. The balance remaining in the State Education Fund,
excluding the balance remaining in the Education Stabilization
Account, that has not been committed for expenditure on or before
June 30 of an odd-numbered fiscal year must be transferred to the
Education Stabilization Account to the extent that such a transfer
would not cause the balance in the Education Stabilization Account
to exceed the limit established in subsection 3.
Sec. 4.5. NRS 387.1223 is hereby amended to read as follows:
387.1223 1. On or before October 1, January 1, April 1 and
July 1, each school district, charter school and university school
for profoundly gifted pupils shall report to the Department, in the
form prescribed by the Department, the average daily enrollment of
pupils pursuant to this section for the immediately preceding quarter
of the school year. If October 1, January 1, April 1 or July 1 falls on
a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, the report may be submitted
before 5 p.m. on the next business day.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the yearly
apportionment from the State Education Fund for each school
district, charter school and university school for profoundly gifted
pupils must be computed by:
(a) Multiplying the adjusted base per pupil funding established
for that school district, charter school or university school for
profoundly gifted pupils for that school year by the sum of:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
(1) The count of pupils enrolled in kindergarten and grades 1
to 12, inclusive, in a public school in the school district, the charter
school or the university school for profoundly gifted pupils based
on the average daily enrollment of those pupils during the quarter.
(2) The count of pupils not included under subparagraph (1)
who are enrolled full-time in a program of distance education
provided by that school district, charter school or university school
for profoundly gifted pupils based on the average daily enrollment
of those pupils during the quarter.
(3) The count of pupils who reside in the county and are
enrolled:
(I) In a public school of the school district and are
concurrently enrolled part-time in a program of distance education
provided by another school district or a charter school, based on the
average daily enrollment of those pupils during the quarter.
(II) In a charter school and are concurrently enrolled part-
time in a program of distance education provided by the school
district, based on the average daily enrollment of those pupils during
the quarter.
(4) The count of pupils not included under subparagraph (1),
(2) or (3), who are receiving special education pursuant to the
provisions of NRS 388.417 to 388.469, inclusive, and 388.5251 to
388.5267, inclusive, based on the average daily enrollment of those
pupils during the quarter and excluding the count of pupils who
have not attained the age of 5 years and who are receiving special
education pursuant to NRS 388.435.
(5) Six-tenths the count of pupils who have not attained the
age of 5 years and who are receiving special education pursuant to
NRS 388.435, based on the average daily enrollment of those pupils
during the quarter.
(6) The count of children detained in facilities for the
detention of children, alternative programs and juvenile forestry
camps receiving instruction pursuant to the provisions of NRS
388.550, 388.560 and 388.570, based on the average daily
enrollment of those pupils during the quarter.
(7) The count of pupils who are enrolled in classes for at
least one semester pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 388A.471,
subsection 1 of NRS 388A.474 or subsection 1 of NRS 392.074,
based on the average daily enrollment of pupils during the quarter
and expressed as a percentage of the total time services are provided
to those pupils per school day in proportion to the total time services
are provided during a school day to pupils who are counted pursuant
to subparagraph (1).
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
(8) The count of pupils enrolled in a challenge school based
on the average daily enrollment of those pupils calculated in the
manner set forth in an agreement entered into pursuant to
NRS 388D.330.
(b) Adding to the amount computed in paragraph (a) the
amounts appropriated pursuant to paragraphs (a), (b) and (e) of
subsection 2 of NRS 387.1214.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, if the
enrollment of pupils in a school district or a charter school that is
located within the school district based on the average daily
enrollment of pupils during the quarter of the school year is less
than or equal to 95 percent of the enrollment of pupils in the same
school district or charter school based on the average daily
enrollment of pupils during the same quarter of the immediately
preceding school year, the enrollment of pupils during the same
quarter of the immediately preceding school year must be used for
purposes of making the monthly apportionments from the State
Education Fund to that school district or charter school pursuant to
NRS 387.124.
4. If the Department determines that a school district, [or]
charter school or university school for profoundly gifted pupils
deliberately causes a decline in the enrollment of pupils in the
school district, [or] charter school or university school for
profoundly gifted pupils to receive a higher apportionment pursuant
to subsection 3, including, without limitation, by eliminating grades
or moving into smaller facilities, the enrollment number from the
current school year must be used for purposes of apportioning
money from the State Education Fund to that school district, [or]
charter school or university school for profoundly gifted pupils
pursuant to NRS 387.124.
5. The Department shall prescribe a process for reconciling the
quarterly reports submitted pursuant to subsection 1 to account for
pupils who leave the school district or a public school during the
school year.
6. Pupils who are excused from attendance at examinations or
have completed their work in accordance with the rules of the board
of trustees must be credited with attendance during that period.
7. Pupils who are incarcerated in a facility or institution
operated by the Department of Corrections must not be counted for
the purpose of computing the yearly apportionment pursuant to this
section. The average daily attendance for such pupils must be
reported to the Department of Education.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
8. Pupils who are enrolled in courses which are approved by
the Department as meeting the requirements for an adult to earn a
high school diploma must not be counted for the purpose of
computing the yearly apportionment pursuant to this section.
Sec. 4.7. NRS 387.1225 is hereby amended to read as follows:
387.1225 1. A hospital or other facility which is licensed by
the Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of
Health and Human Services that provides residential treatment to
children and which operates a private school licensed pursuant to
chapter 394 of NRS may request reimbursement from the [school
district or charter school in which a child is enrolled] Department
for the cost of providing educational services to [the] a child if:
(a) The [school district or charter school] Department verifies
that the child is a patient or resident of the hospital or facility; and
(b) The child attends the private school for more than 7 school
days.
2. A hospital or other facility licensed in the District of
Columbia or any state or territory of the United States that provides
residential treatment and which operates an educational program
accredited by a national organization and approved by the
Department of Education may request reimbursement from the
[school district or charter school in which a child is enrolled]
Department for the cost of providing educational services to [the] a
child if:
(a) The Department [and the school district or charter school, as
applicable, verify] verifies that the child:
(1) Is a patient or resident of the hospital or facility; and
(2) Is a resident of this State; and
(b) The child:
(1) Is admitted to the hospital or facility on an order from a
physician because the necessary treatment required for the child is
not available in this State;
(2) Attends the accredited educational program for more than
7 school days;
(3) Is not homeschooled or enrolled in a private school; and
(4) Has been admitted to the medical facility under the order
of a physician to receive medically necessary treatment for a
medical or mental health condition with which the child has been
diagnosed.
3. A hospital or other facility that wishes to receive
reimbursement pursuant to subsection 2 shall:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
(a) Notify the Department and the school district or charter
school in which the child is enrolled upon admitting the child to the
accredited educational program; and
(b) Transfer any educational records of the child to the school
district or charter school in which the child is enrolled in accordance
with any applicable regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 9.
4. Upon receiving a request for reimbursement pursuant to
subsection 1 or 2, the [school district or charter school in which the
child is enrolled] Department shall determine the amount of
reimbursement to which the hospital or facility is entitled by
multiplying the number of days determined pursuant to subsection 6
by the following, as applicable:
(a) The daily rate of the adjusted base per pupil funding for the
school district which the child would otherwise attend. The daily
rate of the adjusted base per pupil funding for the school district
which the child would otherwise attend must be calculated by
dividing the adjusted base per pupil funding provided to the school
district in which the child is enrolled pursuant to NRS 387.1214 by
180.
(b) The daily rate of the statewide base per pupil funding
amount or adjusted base per pupil funding, as applicable, for the
charter school which the child would otherwise attend. The daily
rate of the statewide base per pupil funding amount or adjusted base
per pupil funding, as applicable, for the charter school which the
child would otherwise attend must be calculated by dividing the
statewide base per pupil funding amount or adjusted base per pupil
funding, as applicable, provided to the charter school in which the
child is enrolled pursuant to NRS 387.1214 by 180.
5. If the request for reimbursement is made pursuant to
subsection 1, the child is a pupil with a disability and the hospital or
facility is in compliance with the Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 et seq., NRS 388.417 to
388.5243, inclusive, and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto,
the hospital or facility is also entitled to an amount determined by
increasing the daily rate determined pursuant to subsection 4 by the
statewide multiplier for the pupil established pursuant to NRS
387.122, which is received by the school district or charter school
where the child was enrolled before being placed in the hospital or
facility for the number of days determined pursuant to subsection 6.
The Department shall distribute the money withheld from the school
district or charter school to the hospital or facility.
6. For the purposes of subsections 4 and 5, the amount of
reimbursement to which the hospital or facility is entitled must be
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
calculated on the basis of the number of school days the child is a
patient or resident of the hospital or facility and attends the private
school or accredited educational program, as applicable, excluding
the 7 school days prescribed in paragraph (b) of subsection 1 or
subparagraph (2) of paragraph (b) of subsection 2, as applicable.
7. A hospital or other facility is not entitled to reimbursement
for days of instruction provided to a child in a year in excess of the
minimum number of days of free school required by NRS 388.090.
8. If a hospital or other facility requests reimbursement from [a
school district or charter school] the Department for the cost of
providing educational services to a pupil with a disability pursuant
to subsection 1 or 2, the school district or charter school in which
the child is enrolled shall be deemed to be the local educational
agency for the child for the purposes of the Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 et seq., NRS 388.417
to 388.5243, inclusive, and any regulations adopted pursuant
thereto.
9. The Department shall adopt any regulations necessary to
carry out the provisions of this section, which may include, without
limitation, regulations to:
(a) Prescribe a procedure for the transfer of educational records
pursuant to subsection 3;
(b) Carry out or ensure compliance with the requirements of
subsections 4 and 5 concerning reimbursement for educational
services provided to a pupil with a disability; and
(c) Require the auditing of [:
(1) A] a hospital or other facility that requests reimbursement
[; and
(2) A school district or charter school from which
reimbursement is requested,
] pursuant to this section to ensure compliance with any
applicable provisions of federal or state law.
10. The provisions of this section must not be construed to
authorize reimbursement pursuant to this section of a hospital or
facility for the cost of health care services provided to a child.
11. As used in this section:
(a) “Hospital” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 449.012.
(b) “Private school” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 394.103.
Sec. 5. NRS 387.12445 is hereby amended to read as follows:
387.12445 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
each school district shall ensure that all adjusted base per pupil
funding received by the school district pursuant to paragraph (c) of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
subsection 2 of NRS 387.1214 is accounted for separately and, after
a deduction for the administrative expenses of the school district in
an amount which does not exceed the amount prescribed by the
Department by regulation for each school district, be distributed and
used as described in this subsection. The adjusted base per pupil
funding provided to each school district must:
(a) Be distributed by each school district to its public schools in
a manner that ensures each pupil in the school district receives a
reasonably equal educational opportunity.
(b) Be used to support the educational needs of all pupils in the
school district, including, without limitation, operating each public
school in the school district, training and supporting educational
personnel and carrying out any program or service established by, or
requirement imposed pursuant to, this title for any purpose for
which specific funding is not appropriated pursuant to paragraph (a),
(b) or (e) of subsection 2 of NRS 387.1214 or NRS 387.122.
2. If a school district determines that an additional amount of
money is necessary to satisfy requirements for maintenance of effort
or any other requirement under federal law for pupils with
disabilities enrolled in the school district, the school district may
transfer the necessary amount of money from the adjusted base per
pupil funding received by the school district for that purpose.
3. Each school district shall ensure that all weighted funding
received by the school district pursuant to paragraph (e) of
subsection 2 of NRS 387.1214 is accounted for separately and
distributed directly to each school in which the relevant pupils are
estimated to be enrolled.
4. Each public school shall account separately for the local
funding for pupils with disabilities received by the public school
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of NRS 387.1214, for the
adjusted base per pupil funding received by the public school
pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 2 of NRS 387.1214, for each
category of weighted funding received by the public school pursuant
to paragraph (e) of subsection 2 of NRS 387.1214 and for money
received from the statewide multiplier pursuant to NRS 387.122.
Unless the provisions of subsection 7 or 8 impose greater
restrictions on the use of weighted funding by a public school, the
public school must use the weighted funding received for each
relevant pupil:
(a) As a supplement to the adjusted base per pupil funding
received for the pupil; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
(b) Solely for the purpose of providing such additional
educational programs, services or support as are necessary to ensure
the pupil receives a reasonably equal educational opportunity.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, the separate
accounting required by subsection 4 for pupils with disabilities and
gifted and talented pupils must include:
(a) The amount of money provided to the public school for
special education; and
(b) The cost of:
(1) Instruction provided by licensed special education
teachers and supporting staff;
(2) Related services, including, without limitation, services
provided by psychologists, therapists and health-related personnel;
(3) Transportation of the pupils with disabilities and gifted
and talented pupils to and from school;
(4) The direct supervision of educational and supporting
programs; and
(5) The supplies and equipment needed for providing special
education.
6. Money received from federal sources must be accounted for
separately and excluded from the accounting required pursuant to
subsection 5.
7. A public school that receives weighted funding for one or
more at-risk pupils must use that weighted funding only to provide
[Victory] services for at-risk pupils and, if one or more at-risk
pupils for whom the school received weighted funding in the at-risk
pupil category also belong to one or more other categories of pupils
who receive weighted funding, the additional services for each such
at-risk pupil which are appropriate for each category to which the at-
risk pupil belongs.
8. A public school that receives weighted funding for one or
more pupils who are English learners must use that weighted
funding only to provide [Zoom] services for pupils who are English
learners and, if one or more English learners for whom the school
received weighted funding in the English learner category also
belong to one or more other categories of pupils who receive
weighted funding, the additional services for each such English
learner which are appropriate for each category to which the English
learner belongs.
9. The Department shall adopt regulations prescribing the
maximum amount of money that each school district may deduct for
its administrative expenses from the adjusted base per pupil funding
received by the school district. When adopting such regulations, the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
Department may express the maximum amount of money that may
be deducted as a percentage of the adjusted base per pupil funding
received by the school district.
10. As used in this section:
(a) [“Victory services”] “Services for at-risk pupils” means any
one or more of the following services:
(1) A prekindergarten program provided free of charge.
(2) A summer academy or other instruction for pupils
provided free of charge at times during the year when school is not
in session.
(3) Additional instruction or other learning opportunities
provided free of charge at times of day when school is not in
session.
(4) Professional development for teachers and other
educational personnel concerning instructional practices and
strategies that have proven to be an effective means to increase pupil
achievement in populations of at-risk pupils.
(5) Incentives for hiring and retaining teachers and other
licensed educational personnel who provide [Victory] services [.]
for at-risk pupils.
(6) Employment of paraprofessionals, other educational
personnel and other persons who provide [Victory] services [.] for
at-risk pupils.
(7) A reading skills center.
(8) Integrated student supports, wrap-around services and
evidence-based programs designed to meet the needs of at-risk
pupils.
(9) Any other service or program that has a demonstrated
record of success for similarly situated pupils in comparable school
districts and has been reviewed and approved as a [Victory] service
for at-risk pupils by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(b) [“Zoom services”] “Services for pupils who are English
learners” means any one or more of the following services:
(1) A prekindergarten program provided free of charge.
(2) A reading skills center.
(3) Professional development for teachers and other licensed
educational personnel regarding effective instructional practices and
strategies for pupils who are English learners.
(4) Incentives for hiring and retaining teachers and other
licensed educational personnel who provide [Zoom] services [.] for
pupils who are English learners.
(5) Engagement and involvement with parents and families
of pupils who are English learners, including, without limitation,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
increasing effective, culturally appropriate communication with and
outreach to parents and families to support the academic
achievement of those pupils.
(6) A summer academy or, for those schools that do not
operate on a traditional school calendar, an intersession academy
provided free of charge, including, without limitation, the provision
of transportation to attend the summer academy or intersession
academy.
(7) An extended school day.
(8) Any other service or program that has a demonstrated
record of success for similarly situated pupils in comparable school
districts and has been reviewed and approved as a [Zoom] service
for pupils who are English learners by the Superintendent of
Public Instruction.
Sec. 6. NRS 387.303 is hereby amended to read as follows:
387.303 1. [Not later than November 1 of each] Each year,
on or before the Friday of the first week in January that contains
5 business days, the board of trustees of each school district shall
submit to the Superintendent of Public Instruction and the
Department of Taxation a report which includes the following
information:
(a) For each fund within the school district, including, without
limitation, the school district’s general fund and any special revenue
fund which receives state money, the total number and salaries of
licensed and nonlicensed persons whose salaries are paid from the
fund and who are employed by the school district in full-time
positions or in part-time positions added together to represent full-
time positions. Information must be provided for the current school
year based upon the school district’s final budget, including any
amendments and augmentations thereto, and for the preceding
school year. An employee must be categorized as filling an
instructional, administrative, instructional support or other position.
(b) The school district’s actual expenditures in the fiscal year
immediately preceding the report.
(c) The school district’s proposed expenditures for the current
fiscal year.
(d) The schedule of salaries for licensed employees in the
current school year and a statement of whether the negotiations
regarding salaries for the current school year have been completed.
If the negotiations have not been completed at the time the schedule
of salaries is submitted, the board of trustees shall submit a
supplemental report to the Superintendent of Public Instruction upon
completion of negotiations or the determination of an arbitrator
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
concerning the negotiations that includes the schedule of salaries
agreed to or required by the arbitrator.
(e) The number of employees who received an increase in salary
pursuant to NRS 391.161, 391.162 or 391.163 for the current and
preceding fiscal years. If the board of trustees is required to pay an
increase in salary retroactively pursuant to NRS 391.161, the board
of trustees shall submit a supplemental report to the Superintendent
of Public Instruction not later than February 15 of the year in which
the retroactive payment was made that includes the number of
teachers to whom an increase in salary was paid retroactively.
(f) The number of employees eligible for health insurance within
the school district for the current and preceding fiscal years and the
amount paid for health insurance for each such employee during
those years.
(g) The rates for fringe benefits, excluding health insurance,
paid by the school district for its licensed employees in the
preceding and current fiscal years.
(h) The amount paid for extra duties, supervision of
extracurricular activities and supplemental pay and the number of
employees receiving that pay in the preceding and current fiscal
years.
2. On or before [November 25] the last Friday in January of
each year, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall submit to
the Office of Finance and the Fiscal Analysis Division of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau, in a format approved by the Director of
the Office of Finance, a compilation of the reports made by each
school district pursuant to subsection 1.
3. In preparing the agency biennial budget request for the State
Education Fund for submission to the Office of Finance, the
Superintendent of Public Instruction:
(a) Shall compile the information from the most recent
compilation of reports submitted pursuant to subsection 2; and
(b) May consider the cost of enhancements to existing programs
or the projected cost of proposed new educational programs,
regardless of whether those enhancements or new programs are
included in the adjusted base per pupil funding for inclusion in the
biennial budget request to the Office of Finance.
4. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall, in the
compilation required by subsection 2, reconcile the revenues of the
school districts with the apportionment received by those districts
from the State Education Fund for the preceding year.
5. The request prepared pursuant to subsection 3 must:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
(a) Be presented by the Superintendent of Public Instruction to
such standing committees of the Legislature as requested by the
standing committees for the purposes of developing educational
programs and providing appropriations for those programs; and
(b) Provide for a direct comparison of appropriations to the
proposed budget of the Governor submitted pursuant to subsection 4
of NRS 353.230.
Sec. 7. NRS 387.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
387.320 [1.] During each quarter of each school year, the
clerk of the board of trustees of a county school district shall cause
to be published on the Internet website of the county school district
a list of expenditures of the county school district made during the
previous quarter school year. The published list of expenditures
shall be in the form prescribed by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction.
[2. The publication required by subsection 1 shall be printed in
some newspaper published and of general circulation in the county
the boundaries of which are conterminous with the boundaries of the
county school district.
3. The newspaper described in subsection 2 must possess the
qualifications prescribed in chapter 238 of NRS.
4. If no qualified newspaper is published within a county, then
the required publication shall be printed in some qualified
newspaper printed in the State of Nevada and having a general
circulation within the county.]
Sec. 7.3. NRS 388.360 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.360 The State Board is hereby designated as the sole state
agency responsible for the administration of career and technical
education in the State of Nevada. The State Board may:
1. Cooperate with any federal agency, board or department
designated to administer the Acts of Congress apportioning federal
money to the State of Nevada for career and technical education.
2. Establish policies and adopt regulations for the
administration of any legislation enacted pursuant thereto by the
State of Nevada.
3. Establish policies and adopt regulations for the
administration of money provided by the Federal Government and
the State of Nevada for the promotion, extension and improvement
of career and technical education in Nevada.
4. Establish policies or regulations and formulate plans for the
promotion of career and technical education in such subjects as are
an essential and integral part of the system of public education in the
State of Nevada.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
5. Establish policies to provide for the preparation of teachers
of such programs and subjects.
6. Approve positions for such persons as may be necessary to
administer the federal act and provisions of this title enacted
pursuant thereto for the State of Nevada.
7. [Direct] Request the Superintendent of Public Instruction to
make studies and investigations relating to career and technical
education.
8. Establish policies to promote and aid in the establishment by
local communities of schools, departments or classes giving training
in career and technical subjects.
9. Cooperate with local communities in the maintenance of
such schools, departments or classes.
10. Prescribe qualifications for the teachers, directors and
supervisors of career and technical subjects.
11. Provide for the certification of such teachers, directors and
supervisors.
12. Establish policies or regulations to cooperate in the
maintenance of classes supported and controlled by the public for
the preparation of the teachers, directors and supervisors of career
and technical subjects, or maintain such classes under its own
direction and control.
13. Establish by regulation the qualifications required for
persons engaged in the training of teachers for career and technical
education.
Sec. 7.7. NRS 388.396 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.396 For each grant of money awarded pursuant to NRS
388.393, 388.394 or 388.395, the [Executive Officer of the State
Board] Superintendent of Public Instruction shall designate a
program professional to:
1. Evaluate the manner in which the money was expended and
the effectiveness of the program of career and technical education
for which the money was granted; and
2. Report the results of the review to the State Board.
Sec. 8. NRS 388.570 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.570 [1.] The State Board shall establish regulations for
the computation of enrollment and average daily attendance of
children detained in facilities for the detention of children,
alternative programs and juvenile forestry camps receiving
instruction pursuant to the provisions of this section and NRS
388.550 and 388.560.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
[2. Boards of trustees of school districts providing such
instruction shall report to the Superintendent of Public Instruction at
such times and in such manner as the Superintendent prescribes.]
Sec. 9. NRS 388.700 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.700 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, [for
each school quarter of a school year,] the ratio in each school district
of pupils per licensed teacher designated to teach, on a full-time
basis, in classes where core curriculum is taught:
(a) In kindergarten and grades 1 and 2, must not exceed 16 to 1,
and in grade 3, must not exceed 18 to 1; or
(b) If a plan is approved pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS
388.720, must not exceed the ratio set forth in that plan for the grade
levels specified in the plan.
 In determining this ratio, all licensed educational personnel who
teach a grade level specified in paragraph (a) or a grade level
specified in a plan that is approved pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS
388.720, as applicable for the school district, must be counted
except teachers of art, music, physical education or special
education, teachers who teach one or two specific subject areas to
more than one classroom of pupils, counselors, librarians,
administrators, deans, specialists, any administrators or other
licensed educational personnel, including, without limitation,
counselors, coaches and special education teachers, who may be
present in a classroom but do not teach every pupil in the classroom
and teachers who are not actively teaching pupils during a class
period or who do not teach a subject area for which the ratio of
pupils per licensed teacher is being determined.
2. A school district may, within the limits of any plan adopted
pursuant to NRS 388.720, assign a pupil whose enrollment in a
grade occurs after the end of a [quarter] reporting period during the
school year to any existing class regardless of the number of pupils
in the class if the school district requests and is approved for a
variance from the State Board pursuant to subsection 4 [.] for any
relevant reporting period.
3. Each school district that includes one or more elementary
schools which exceed the ratio of pupils per class during any
[quarter of] reporting period during a school year [, as reported to
the Department] pursuant to NRS 388.725:
(a) Set forth in subsection 1;
(b) Prescribed in conjunction with a legislative appropriation for
the support of the class-size reduction program; or
(c) Defined by a legislatively approved alternative class-size
reduction plan, if applicable to that school district,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 23 –
 must request a variance for each such school for the next [quarter
of the current school year if a quarter remains in that school year or
for the next quarter of the succeeding school year, as applicable,]
reporting period from the State Board by providing a written
statement that includes the reasons for the request, the justification
for exceeding the applicable prescribed ratio of pupils per class and
a plan of actions that the school district will take to reduce the ratio
of pupils per class.
4. The State Board may grant to a school district a variance
from the limitation on the number of pupils per class set forth in
paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of subsection 3 for good cause, including
the lack of available financial support specifically set aside for the
reduction of pupil-teacher ratios.
5. The State Board shall, on a [quarterly] semiannual basis,
submit a report to the Interim Finance Committee on each variance
requested by a school district pursuant to subsection 4 during the
preceding [quarter] reporting period and, if a variance was granted,
an identification of each elementary school for which a variance was
granted and the specific justification for the variance.
6. [The State Board shall, on or before February 1 of each odd-
numbered year, submit a report to the Legislature on:
(a) Each variance requested by a school district pursuant to
subsection 4 during the preceding biennium and, if a variance was
granted, an identification of each elementary school for which
variance was granted and the specific justification for the variance.
(b) The data reported to it by the various school districts
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 388.710, including an explanation
of that data, and the current pupil-teacher ratios per class in the
grade levels specified in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 or the grade
levels specified in a plan that is approved pursuant to subsection 3
of NRS 388.720, as applicable for the school district.
7.] The Department shall, on or before November 15 of each
year, report to the Chief of the Budget Division of the Office of
Finance and the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau:
(a) The number of teachers employed full-time;
(b) The number of teachers employed in order to attain the ratio
required by subsection 1;
(c) The number of substitute teachers filling vacancies or long-
term positions;
(d) The number of pupils enrolled; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 24 –
(e) The number of teachers assigned to teach in the same
classroom with another teacher or in any other arrangement other
than one teacher assigned to one classroom of pupils,
 during the current school year in the grade levels specified in
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 or the grade levels specified in a plan
that is approved pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 388.720, as
applicable, for each school district.
[8.] 7. The provisions of this section do not apply to a charter
school or to a program of distance education provided pursuant to
NRS 388.820 to 388.874, inclusive.
8. As used in this section, “reporting period” means the
reporting periods described in subsection 1 of NRS 388.725.
Sec. 10. NRS 388.720 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.720 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
each school district together with the recognized associations
representing licensed educational personnel shall develop a plan to
reduce the district’s pupil-teacher ratio per class in kindergarten and
grades 1, 2 and 3 within the limits of available financial support
specifically set aside for this purpose and submit that plan to the
State Board [.] on or before October 1 of each year.
2. In lieu of complying with the pupil-teacher ratio prescribed
in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 388.700, a school district in
a county whose population is less than 100,000 may, in consultation
with the recognized associations representing licensed educational
personnel, develop a plan to reduce the district’s pupil-teacher ratios
per class for specified grade levels in elementary schools.
Alternative ratios for grade 6 may only be approved for those school
districts that include grade 6 in elementary school. The alternative
pupil-teacher ratios must not:
(a) Exceed 22 to 1 in grades 1, 2 and 3; and
(b) Exceed 25 to 1 in grades 4 and 5 or grades 4, 5 and 6, as
applicable.
3. The State Board shall approve a plan submitted pursuant to
subsection 2 if the plan:
(a) Reduces the district’s pupil-teacher ratio in the elementary
schools within the school district; and
(b) Is fiscally neutral such that the plan will not cost more to
carry out than a plan that complies with the ratios prescribed in
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 388.700.
Sec. 11. NRS 388.723 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.723 The Department shall:
1. Develop policies and procedures for:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 25 –
(a) Monitoring the plan of each school district to reduce the
pupil-teacher ratio per class developed pursuant to NRS 388.720,
which must include, without limitation, provisions for:
(1) The review of each plan submitted to the State Board to
ensure the adequacy of such plans; and
(2) The review of any data submitted to the State Board
pursuant to NRS 388.710.
(b) Monitoring the [quarterly] semiannual reports concerning
the average daily enrollment of pupils and the pupil-teacher ratios in
each school district submitted by the board of trustees of the school
district pursuant to NRS 388.725 to ensure the completeness and
accuracy of such reports.
(c) The review of any requests for a variance submitted to the
State Board pursuant to NRS 388.700, which must include, without
limitation, provisions to verify the information in such requests to
ensure the accuracy of the reports on variances submitted by the
State Board to the [Legislature] Interim Finance Committee
pursuant to that section.
[(d) The distribution of money to each school district for the
reduction of pupil-teacher ratios, which must include, without
limitation, provisions for:
(1) The retention of all documents and records related to the
distribution; and
(2) The review of the work performed to determine the
distribution of such money to ensure the accuracy of supporting
information and the calculations used in making such
determinations.]
2. Provide guidance to the school districts on:
(a) The development of a plan to reduce the pupil-teacher ratio
per class pursuant to NRS 388.720. In developing such guidance,
the Department shall:
(1) Outline the criteria that each plan must include to meet
the requirements of NRS 388.720.
(2) Provide examples of policies, plans or strategies adopted
by other states to reduce class sizes.
(b) The requirements for reporting information related to the
reduction of pupil-teacher ratios.
(c) The data that must be monitored pursuant to NRS 388.710
by each school district and used to measure the effectiveness of the
implementation of any plan to reduce pupil-teacher ratios.
3. Communicate with the board of trustees of each school
district regarding the expectations of the Department for the use of
any money distributed to reduce pupil-teacher ratios in the school
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 26 –
district, including, without limitation, the minimum number of
teachers the school district is expected to employ.
Sec. 12. NRS 388.725 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.725 1. [On or before August 1, November 1, February 1
and May 1 of each] Each year, the board of trustees of each school
district shall report to the Department on or before October 15 for
the [preceding quarter:] reporting period beginning on July 1 and
ending on September 30 and on or before April 15 for the
reporting period beginning January 1 and ending on March 31:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), the average
daily enrollment of pupils and the ratio of pupils per licensed
teacher for grades 1, 2 and 3 for each elementary school in the
school district.
(b) If the State Board has approved an alternative class-size
reduction plan for the school district pursuant to NRS 388.720, the
average daily enrollment of pupils and the ratio of pupils per
licensed teacher for those grades which are required to comply with
the alternative class-size reduction plan for each elementary school
in the school district.
2. The board of trustees of each school district shall post on the
Internet website maintained by the school district:
(a) The information concerning average daily enrollment and
class size for each elementary school in the school district, as
reported to the Department pursuant to subsection 1; and
(b) An identification of each elementary school in the school
district, if any, for which a variance from the prescribed pupil-
teacher ratios was granted by the State Board pursuant to subsection
4 of NRS 388.700.
Sec. 13. NRS 388A.345 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.345 1. [On] Each year, on or before [November 1 of
each year,] the Friday of the first week in January that contains 5
business days, the governing body of each charter school shall
submit to the sponsor of the charter school, the Superintendent of
Public Instruction and the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmission to the Majority Leader of the Senate and the
Speaker of the Assembly a report that includes:
(a) A written description of the progress of the charter school in
achieving the mission and goals of the charter school set forth in its
application.
(b) For each fund maintained by the charter school, including,
without limitation, the general fund of the charter school and any
special revenue fund which receives state money, the total number
and salaries of licensed and nonlicensed persons whose salaries are
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 27 –
paid from the fund and who are employed by the governing body in
full-time positions or in part-time positions added together to
represent full-time positions. Information must be provided for the
current school year based upon the final budget of the charter
school, including any amendments and augmentations thereto, and
for the preceding school year. An employee must be categorized as
filling an instructional, administrative, instructional support or other
position.
(c) The actual expenditures of the charter school in the fiscal
year immediately preceding the report.
(d) The proposed expenditures of the charter school for the
current fiscal year.
(e) The salary schedule for licensed employees and nonlicensed
teachers in the current school year and a statement of whether salary
negotiations for the current school year have been completed. If
salary negotiations have not been completed at the time the salary
schedule is submitted, the governing body shall submit a
supplemental report to the Superintendent of Public Instruction upon
completion of negotiations.
(f) The number of employees eligible for health insurance within
the charter school for the current and preceding fiscal years and the
amount paid for health insurance for each such employee during
those years.
(g) The rates for fringe benefits, excluding health insurance,
paid by the charter school for its licensed employees in the
preceding and current fiscal years.
(h) The amount paid for extra duties, supervision of
extracurricular activities and supplemental pay and the number of
employees receiving that pay in the preceding and current fiscal
years.
2. On or before [November 25] the last Friday in January of
each year, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall submit to
the Office of Finance and the Fiscal Analysis Division of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau, in a format approved by the Director of
the Office of Finance, a compilation of the reports made by each
governing body pursuant to subsection 1.
3. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall, in the
compilation required by subsection 2, reconcile the revenues and
expenditures of the charter schools with the apportionment received
by those schools from the State Education Fund for the preceding
year.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 28 –
Sec. 14. NRS 388A.355 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.355 On or before [December] February 15 of each [odd-
numbered] year, the sponsor of a charter school must submit a
report describing any actions the sponsor of the charter school has
taken pursuant to NRS 388A.330 to the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education if:
1. The charter school has received, within each of the
immediately preceding 3 consecutive school years, one of the two
lowest ratings of performance pursuant to the statewide system of
accountability for public schools; and
2. The governing body of the charter school does not plan to
close the charter school pursuant to NRS 388A.306 or change the
sponsorship of the charter school pursuant to NRS 388A.231.
Sec. 15. NRS 388C.250 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388C.250 1. The governing body of a university school for
profoundly gifted pupils shall submit to the Department in a format
prescribed by the Department such information as requested by the
Superintendent of Public Instruction for purposes of accountability
reporting for the university school.
2. [The] Each year, the governing body of a university school
for profoundly gifted pupils shall, on or before [November 15 of
each year,] the Friday of the first week in January that contains 5
business days, submit to the Department in a format prescribed by
the Department the following information:
(a) The actual expenditures of the university school for
profoundly gifted pupils in the fiscal year immediately preceding the
report; and
(b) The proposed expenditures of the university school for
profoundly gifted pupils for the current fiscal year.
Sec. 16. NRS 388G.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388G.200 [1.] Each empowerment school, other than a
charter school that is sponsored by the State Public Charter School
Authority, by a college or university within the Nevada System of
Higher Education or by a city or county, shall, on a quarterly basis,
submit to the board of trustees of the school district in which the
school is located a report that includes:
[(a)] 1. The financial status of the school; and
[(b)] 2. A description of the school’s compliance with each
component of the empowerment plan for the school.
[2. Each charter school that is sponsored by the State Public
Charter School Authority, by a college or university within the
Nevada System of Higher Education or by a city or county which is
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 29 –
approved to operate as an empowerment school shall, on a quarterly
basis, submit to the Department a report that includes:
(a) The financial status of the school; and
(b) A description of the school’s compliance with each
component of the empowerment plan for the school.
3. The board of trustees of a school district shall conduct a
financial audit of each empowerment school within the school
district, other than a charter school that is sponsored by the State
Public Charter School Authority, by a college or university within
the Nevada System of Higher Education or by a city or county. Each
financial audit must be conducted on an annual basis and more
frequently if determined necessary by the board of trustees.
4. The Department shall conduct a financial audit of each
charter school that is sponsored by the State Public Charter School
Authority, by a college or university within the Nevada System of
Higher Education or by a city or county which operates as an
empowerment school on an annual basis and more frequently if
determined necessary by the Department.
5. On or before July 1 of each year, the board of trustees of
each school district shall compile the reports and audits required
pursuant to subsections 1 and 3, if any, and forward the compilation
to the:
(a) Governor;
(b) Department; and
(c) Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education.
6. On or before July 1 of each year, the Department shall
compile the reports and audits required pursuant to subsections 2
and 4, if any, and forward the compilation to the:
(a) Governor; and
(b) Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education.]
Sec. 17. NRS 389.167 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.167 1. A pupil enrolled at a public school must be
allowed to apply one or more credits toward the total number of
credits required for graduation from high school if the pupil
successfully completes the number of hours in a work-based
learning program required by regulation of the State Board to earn
such credits. Any credits earned for successful completion of a
work-based learning program must be applied toward the pupil’s
elective course credits and not toward a course that is required for
graduation from high school.
2. The board of trustees of a school district or the governing
body of a charter school may offer a work-based learning program
upon application to and with the approval of the Superintendent of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 30 –
Public Instruction. An application to offer a work-based learning
program must include, without limitation:
(a) The fields, trades or occupations in which a work-based
learning program will be offered.
(b) The qualifications of a pupil to participate in the work-based
learning program. Such qualifications must allow a majority of
pupils to be eligible to participate in the work-based learning
program.
(c) A description of the process that will be used by pupils to
apply to participate in a work-based learning program.
(d) A description of the manner in which participation in a
work-based learning program and completion of the requirements of
a work-based learning program will be verified.
(e) A description of the manner in which the performance of a
pupil who participates in the work-based learning program will be
evaluated, which must include, without limitation, an on-site
evaluation of the performance of the pupil.
3. Upon approval by the Superintendent of Public Instruction
of an application to offer a work-based learning program submitted
pursuant to subsection 2, the board of trustees or the governing body
shall:
(a) Designate an employee of the school district or charter
school, as applicable, to serve as a work-based learning coordinator
to coordinate and oversee work-based learning programs. Such an
employee must ensure that each business, agency or organization
that will offer employment and supervision of a pupil as part of the
work-based learning program is suitable for participation in a work-
based learning program.
(b) Establish and maintain a list of businesses, agencies and
organizations that have been found suitable by the work-based
learning coordinator pursuant to paragraph (a).
4. To receive approval from the Superintendent of Public
Instruction to offer a work-based learning program, the work-based
learning program must include, without limitation, requirements
that:
(a) A detailed training agreement and training plan be completed
for each pupil participating in the work-based learning program for
credit that identifies the specific tasks in which the pupil will
participate that will develop competency of the pupil in the
workplace;
(b) A pupil participating in the work-based learning program be
allowed to leave the public school in which he or she is enrolled
during the school day to participate in such a program;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 31 –
(c) Participation by a pupil in the work-based learning program
will develop a broad range of skills and will allow a pupil to focus
on his or her chosen career pathway; and
(d) Training be completed by each pupil participating in the
work-based learning program on:
(1) Identifying and reporting harassment in the workplace;
(2) Developing and maintaining healthy relationships in the
workplace; and
(3) Identifying the signs of a person engaging in predatory
conduct to prepare a pupil for sexual activity or to foster an
inappropriate personal or professional relationship with a pupil,
including, without limitation, through communicating or attempting
to befriend or establish a relationship or other connection with a
parent or legal guardian of a pupil in furtherance of such conduct.
5. A school district or charter school may allow a pupil who
successfully completes a work-based learning program to earn dual
credit for participation in the work-based learning program.
[6. On or before January 15 of each odd-numbered year, the
board of trustees of a school district and the governing body of a
charter school that offers a work-based learning program shall
prepare a report concerning the manner in which the work-based
learning program has been carried out and submit the report to the
State Board and the Legislature. The report must include, without
limitation:
(a) The number of pupils participating in the work-based
learning program; and
(b) The types of work-based learning offered through the work-
based learning program.
7. The number of pupils participating in the work-based
learning program reported pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 6
must be disaggregated on the basis of the following characteristics:
(a) Pupils who are American Indian or Alaska Native, Asian,
Black or African American, Hispanic or Latino, Native Hawaiian or
Pacific Islander, white or two or more races;
(b) Gender of pupils;
(c) Pupils who are migrants; and
(d) Pupils who are members of special populations, as defined in
20 U.S.C. § 2302(48).]
Sec. 18. NRS 391.019 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.019 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 391.027,
the Commission shall adopt regulations:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 32 –
(a) Prescribing the qualifications for licensing teachers and other
educational personnel and the procedures for the issuance and
renewal of those licenses. The regulations:
(1) Must include, without limitation, the qualifications for
licensing teachers [and administrators] pursuant to an alternative
route to licensure which provides that the required education and
training may be provided by any qualified provider which has been
approved by the Commission, including, without limitation,
institutions of higher education and other providers that operate
independently of an institution of higher education. The regulations
adopted pursuant to this subparagraph must:
(I) Establish the requirements for approval as a qualified
provider;
(II) Require a qualified provider to be selective in its
acceptance of students;
(III) Require a qualified provider to provide in-person or
virtual supervised, school-based experiences and ongoing support
for its students, such as mentoring and coaching;
(IV) Significantly limit the amount of course work
required or provide for the waiver of required course work for
students who achieve certain scores on tests;
(V) Allow for the completion in 2 years or less of the
education and training required under the alternative route to
licensure;
(VI) Provide that a person who has completed the
education and training required under the alternative route to
licensure and who has satisfied all other requirements for licensure
may apply for a regular license pursuant to sub-subparagraph (VII)
regardless of whether the person has received an offer of
employment from a school district, charter school or private school;
and
(VII) Upon the completion by a person of the education
and training required under the alternative route to licensure and the
satisfaction of all other requirements for licensure, provide for the
issuance of a regular license to the person pursuant to the provisions
of this chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.
(2) Must include, without limitation, qualifications and
procedures for licensed teachers and other licensed educational
personnel to become licensed as an administrator without
restricting the ability of a person who becomes an administrator
pursuant to this subparagraph to serve as an administrator.
(3) Must require an applicant for a license to teach middle
school or junior high school education or secondary education to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 33 –
demonstrate proficiency in a field of specialization or area of
concentration by successfully completing course work prescribed by
the Department or completing a subject matter competency
examination prescribed by the Department with a score deemed
satisfactory.
[(3)] (4) Must not prescribe qualifications which are more
stringent than the qualifications set forth in NRS 391.0315 for a
licensed teacher who applies for an additional license in accordance
with that section.
(b) Identifying fields of specialization in teaching which require
the specialized training of teachers.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 391.125, requiring
teachers to obtain from the Department an endorsement in a field of
specialization to be eligible to teach in that field of specialization.
(d) Setting forth the educational requirements a teacher must
satisfy to qualify for an endorsement in each field of specialization.
(e) Setting forth the qualifications and requirements for
obtaining a license or endorsement to teach American Sign
Language, including, without limitation, being registered with the
Aging and Disability Services Division of the Department of Health
and Human Services pursuant to NRS 656A.100 to engage in the
practice of sign language interpreting in a primary or secondary
educational setting.
(f) Requiring teachers and other educational personnel to be
registered with the Aging and Disability Services Division pursuant
to NRS 656A.100 to engage in the practice of sign language
interpreting in a primary or secondary educational setting if they:
(1) Provide instruction or other educational services; and
(2) Concurrently engage in the practice of sign language
interpreting, as defined in NRS 656A.060.
(g) Prescribing course work on parental involvement and family
engagement. The Commission shall:
(1) Work in cooperation with the Office of Parental
Involvement and Family Engagement created by NRS 385.630 in
developing the regulations required by this paragraph.
(2) Establish standards for professional development training
which may be used to satisfy any course work requirement
prescribed pursuant to this paragraph.
(h) Establishing the requirements for obtaining an endorsement
on the license of a teacher, administrator or other educational
personnel in cultural competency.
(i) Authorizing the Superintendent of Public Instruction to issue
a license by endorsement to an applicant who holds an equivalent
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 34 –
license or authorization issued by a governmental entity in another
country if the Superintendent determines that the qualifications for
the equivalent license or authorization are substantially similar to
those prescribed pursuant to paragraph (a).
(j) Establishing the requirements for obtaining an endorsement
on the license of a teacher, administrator or other educational
personnel in teaching courses relating to financial literacy.
(k) Authorizing a person who is employed as a paraprofessional
and enrolled in a program to become a teacher to complete an
accelerated program of student teaching in the same or a
substantially similar area in which the person is employed as a
paraprofessional while remaining employed as a paraprofessional.
(l) Requiring the Department to accept a program of student
teaching or other teaching experience completed in another state or
foreign country by an applicant for a license if the Department
determines that the program or experience substantially fulfills the
standards of a program of student teaching in this State.
(m) Authorizing a person who is employed by a public school to
provide support or other services relating to school psychology, if
the person does not hold a license or endorsement as a school
psychologist but is enrolled in a program that would allow the
person to obtain such a license or endorsement, to complete a
program of internship in school psychology while remaining
employed in such a position.
(n) To carry out the provisions of NRS 391B.010.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 391.027, the
Commission may adopt such other regulations as it deems necessary
for its own government or to carry out its duties.
3. Any regulation which increases the amount of education,
training or experience required for licensing:
(a) Must, in addition to the requirements for publication in
chapter 233B of NRS, be publicized before its adoption in a manner
reasonably calculated to inform those persons affected by the
change.
(b) Must not become effective until at least 1 year after the date
it is adopted by the Commission.
(c) Is not applicable to a license in effect on the date the
regulation becomes effective.
Sec. 19. NRS 391.155 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.155 Each school district in this State that employs a
consultant shall, at least [once every 6 months,] annually, submit to
the Interim Finance Committee a report setting forth:
1. The number of consultants employed by the school district;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 35 –
2. The purpose for which the school district employs each
consultant;
3. The amount of money or other remuneration received by
each consultant from the school district; and
4. The length of time each consultant has been employed by
the school district.
Sec. 19.3. Chapter 391A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 19.5 and 19.7 of this act.
Sec. 19.5. 1. The Department shall develop and carry into
effect a program of block grants for the purposes of awarding
grants of money to an institution that is awarded a grant pursuant
to NRS 391A.580.
2. The program of block grants developed pursuant to this
section shall provide one lump-sum distribution of grants of
money to an institution that is awarded a grant pursuant to
NRS 391A.580.
Sec. 19.7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 20. NRS 391A.575 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.575 1. The Teach Nevada Scholarship Program
Account is hereby created in the State General Fund. The Account
must be administered by the [State Board.] Department.
2. The interest and income earned on:
(a) The money in the Account, after deducting any applicable
charges; and
(b) Unexpended appropriations made to the Account from the
State General Fund,
 must be credited to the Account.
3. Any money remaining in the Account at the end of a fiscal
year, including, without limitation, any unexpended appropriations
made to the Account from the State General Fund does not revert to
the State General Fund, and the balance in the Account must be
carried forward to the next fiscal year.
4. The [State Board] Department may accept gifts and grants
of money from any source for deposit in the Account.
5. The money in the Account may only be used to:
(a) Award grants to universities, colleges and other providers of
an alternative licensure program that are approved to award Teach
Nevada Scholarships pursuant to NRS 391A.585.
(b) Disburse the money retained pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 2 of NRS 391A.580 to a scholarship recipient who meets
the requirements of subsection 4 of NRS 391A.585.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 36 –
Sec. 20.5. NRS 391A.575 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
391A.575 1. The Teach Nevada [Scholarship] Recruitment,
Preparation, and Retention Program Account is hereby created in
the State General Fund. The Account must be administered by the
Department.
2. The interest and income earned on:
(a) The money in the Account, after deducting any applicable
charges; and
(b) Unexpended appropriations made to the Account from the
State General Fund,
 must be credited to the Account.
3. Any money remaining in the Account at the end of a fiscal
year, including, without limitation, any unexpended appropriations
made to the Account from the State General Fund does not revert to
the State General Fund, and the balance in the Account must be
carried forward to the next fiscal year.
4. The Department may accept gifts and grants of money from
any source for deposit in the Account.
5. The money in the Account may [only] be used to [:
(a) Award] award grants to universities, colleges and other
providers of an alternative licensure program that are approved to
award [Teach Nevada Scholarships] scholarships pursuant to
NRS 391A.585.
[(b) Disburse the money retained pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 2 of NRS 391A.580 to a scholarship recipient who meets
the requirements of subsection 4 of NRS 391A.585.]
Sec. 21. NRS 391A.580 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.580 1. A public or private university, college or other
provider of an alternative licensure program in this State is eligible
to apply to the [State Board] Department for a grant from the
Account to award scholarships to students who attend the university,
college or other provider of an alternative licensure program to
complete a program offered by the university, college or other
provider of an alternative licensure program that has been approved
by the State Board and which:
(a) Upon completion makes a student eligible to obtain a license
to teach kindergarten, any grade from grades 1 through 12 or in the
subject area of special education in this State; or
(b) Allows a student to specialize in the subject area of early
childhood education.
2. The [State Board] Department shall:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 37 –
(a) Establish the number of Teach Nevada Scholarships that will
be available each year based upon the amount of money available in
the Account.
(b) Review all applications submitted pursuant to subsection 1
and award a grant of money from the Account to an approved
university, college or other provider of an alternative licensure
program to the extent that money is available in an amount
determined by the [State Board. The State Board] Department. The
Department shall retain 25 percent of such an award in the Account
for disbursement to a scholarship recipient who meets the
requirements of subsection 4 of NRS 391A.585.
3. The [State Board:] Department:
(a) Shall prioritize the award of grants from the Account to a
university, college or other provider of an alternative licensure
program that will provide scholarships to a greater number of
recipients who are veterans or the spouses of veterans.
(b) May prioritize the award of grants from the Account to a
university, college or other provider of an alternative licensure
program that demonstrates the university, college or other provider
of an alternative licensure program will provide scholarships to a
greater number of recipients who:
(1) Agree to complete the requirements to obtain an
endorsement to teach English as a second language or an
endorsement to teach special education;
(2) Intend to teach in public schools in this State which have
the highest shortage of teachers;
(3) Have been economically disadvantaged or belong to a
racial or ethnic minority group; or
(4) Will be eligible to teach in a subject area for which there
is a shortage of teachers. Such a subject area may include, without
limitation, science, technology, engineering, mathematics, special
education or English as a second language.
4. A student may apply for a Teach Nevada Scholarship from a
university, college or other provider of an alternative licensure
program that receives a grant from the Account only if:
(a) The student attends or has been accepted to attend the
university, college or other provider of an alternative licensure
program to complete a program described in subsection 1; and
(b) The student [obtained] :
(1) Obtained a high school diploma awarded by a public or
private high school located in this State [or public high school that is
located in a county that borders this State and accepts pupils who
are residents of this State or] ;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 38 –
(2) Is a resident of this State who obtained a high school
diploma awarded by a public or private high school located in
another state;
(3) Before 20 years of age, successfully completed the high
school equivalency assessment selected by the State Board pursuant
to NRS 390.055 [before 20 years of age.] , if the assessment was
administered in this State; or
(4) Is a resident of this State who, before 20 years of age,
successfully completed the high school equivalency assessment
selected by the State Board pursuant to NRS 390.055 if the
assessment was administered outside of this State.
5. An application submitted by the student must identify the
program to be completed and the date by which the student must
complete the program to finish on schedule.
6. A student selected to receive a Teach Nevada Scholarship
must agree to:
(a) Complete the program described in subsection 1 in which
he or she has been accepted; and
(b) Upon completion of the program:
(1) Apply for and receive a license to teach in this State
which may include, without limitation, a provisional license; and
(2) If the student receives a provisional license, complete all
courses of study and other requirements for a license in this State
which is not provisional within 3 years after the date on which the
provisional license was issued.
7. The [State Board] Department may adopt any regulations
necessary to carry out the provisions of NRS 391A.550 to
391A.595, inclusive.
Sec. 21.5. NRS 391A.580 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
391A.580 1. A public or private university, college or other
provider of an alternative licensure program in this State is eligible
to apply to the Department for a grant from the Account to award
scholarships to students who attend the university, college or other
provider of an alternative licensure program to complete a
traditional pathway or alternative licensure program offered by the
university, college or other provider of an alternative licensure
program that has been approved by the [State Board] Commission
on Professional Standards in Education and which:
(a) Upon completion makes a student eligible to obtain a license
and endorsement to teach kindergarten, any grade from grades 1
through 12 or in [the] a subject area [of] for which there is a
shortage of teachers, including, without limitation, science,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 39 –
technology, engineering, mathematics, special education or
English as a second language, in this State; [or]
(b) Allows a student to specialize in the subject area of early
childhood education [.] ; or
(c) Results in the student obtaining a certificate of advanced
study, master’s degree or other degree which is more advanced
than a bachelor’s degree in education or in a related field.
2. The Department shall:
(a) Establish the number of [Teach Nevada Scholarships]
scholarships that will be available each year based upon the amount
of money available in the Account.
(b) Review all applications submitted pursuant to subsection 1
and award a grant of money from the Account to an approved
university, college or other provider of an alternative licensure
program to the extent that money is available in an amount
determined by the Department.
3. The Department:
(a) Shall prioritize the award of grants from the Account to a
university, college or other provider of an alternative licensure
program that will provide scholarships to a greater number of
recipients who are veterans or the spouses of veterans.
(b) May prioritize the award of grants from the Account to a
university, college or other provider of an alternative licensure
program that demonstrates the university, college or other provider
of an alternative licensure program will provide scholarships to a
greater number of recipients who:
(1) Agree to complete the requirements to obtain an
endorsement to teach English as a second language or an
endorsement to teach special education;
(2) Intend to teach in public schools in this State which have
the highest shortage of teachers;
(3) Have been economically disadvantaged or belong to a
racial or ethnic minority group; or
(4) Will be eligible to teach in a subject area for which there
is a shortage of teachers. Such a subject area may include, without
limitation, science, technology, engineering, mathematics, special
education or English as a second language.
4. A student may apply for a [Teach Nevada Scholarship]
scholarship from a university, college or other provider of an
alternative licensure program that receives a grant from the Account
only if:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 40 –
(a) The student attends or has been accepted to attend the
university, college or other provider of an alternative licensure
program to complete a program described in subsection 1; and
(b) The student:
(1) Obtained a high school diploma awarded by a public or
private high school located in this State;
(2) Is a resident of this State who obtained a high school
diploma awarded by a public or private high school located in
another state;
(3) Before 20 years of age, successfully completed the high
school equivalency assessment selected by the State Board pursuant
to NRS 390.055, if the assessment was administered in this State; or
(4) Is a resident of this State who, before 20 years of age,
successfully completed the high school equivalency assessment
selected by the State Board pursuant to NRS 390.055 if the
assessment was administered outside of this State.
5. An application submitted by the student must identify the
program to be completed and the date by which the student must
complete the program to finish on schedule.
6. A student selected to receive a [Teach Nevada Scholarship]
scholarship pursuant to this section must agree to:
(a) Complete the program described in subsection 1 in which he
or she has been accepted; and
(b) Upon completion of the program:
(1) Apply for and receive a license to teach in this State
which may include, without limitation, a provisional license; and
(2) If the student receives a provisional license, complete all
courses of study and other requirements for a license in this State
which is not provisional within 3 years after the date on which the
provisional license was issued.
7. The Department may adopt any regulations necessary to
carry out the provisions of NRS 391A.550 to 391A.595, inclusive.
Sec. 22. NRS 391A.585 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.585 1. Each university, college or other provider of an
alternative licensure program that is awarded a grant of money from
the Account pursuant to NRS 391A.580 shall use the money to
award [Teach Nevada Scholarships] scholarships to students who
will attend the university, college or other provider of an alternative
licensure program with the intent to complete a program described
in subsection 1 of NRS 391A.580. Such students may include,
without limitation:
(a) Recent high school graduates who enroll in a program
described in subsection 1 of NRS 391A.580;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 41 –
(b) Students who are enrolled at a university or college who
change their academic program or major to a program described in
subsection 1 of NRS 391A.580;
(c) Students who have completed some credits at a university or
college and who enroll in a program described in subsection 1 of
NRS 391A.580;
(d) Students who possess a bachelor’s degree in a field other
than education who pursue an alternative route to licensure as a
teacher;
(e) Veterans and the spouses of veterans; [and]
(f) Students who have had some experience working in a
classroom, including, without limitation, as a paraprofessional or
substitute teacher [.] ; and
(g) Students who possess a bachelor’s degree and have taught
in a public school in this State for at least 2 years.
2. A university, college or other provider of an alternative
licensure program may award a [Teach Nevada Scholarship]
scholarship to a scholarship recipient in an amount [:
(a) Not] not to exceed the cost of [receiving a bachelor’s]
attendance, based on the number of credits for which the student
is enrolled, as recorded by the university, college or other provider
of an alternative licensure program, for not more than:
(a) Six semesters, for a student enrolled in courses to obtain a
bachelor’s degree [at a public university in this State prorated over
the number of semesters required for the student to complete the
program;] ;
(b) Three semesters, for a student enrolled in courses to obtain
a graduate degree; and
[(b) Equal to the difference between the amount of tuition,
registration fees and other mandatory fees charged to the student for
the program described in subsection 1 of NRS 391A.580, excluding
any amount of the tuition and fees that is waived by the university,
college or other provider of an]
(c) Three years, for a student enrolled in an alternative
licensure program . [, and the total amount of any other gift aid
received by the student.]
3. A university, college or other provider of an alternative
licensure program that awards a [Teach Nevada Scholarship]
scholarship shall [, at] :
(a) At the beginning of each semester disburse to the scholarship
recipient [75 percent] the full amount of the scholarship money
awarded to the scholarship recipient for the semester.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 42 –
(b) To the extent authorized by the Family Educational Rights
and Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, and any regulations
adopted pursuant thereto, enter into an agreement with the
Department to share data for the purpose of ensuring that the
scholarships are disbursed in a fiscally responsible manner and
determining whether the scholarships adequately retain
prospective teachers in this State.
[4. A scholarship recipient may only receive the 25 percent of
the scholarship money that is retained by the State Board pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of NRS 391A.580 if the scholarship
recipient:
(a) Completes the program for which he or she was awarded the
scholarship;
(b) Maintains employment as a teacher at a public school in this
State for 5 consecutive school years immediately following
completion of the program unless the State Board waives this
requirement for good cause shown; and
(c) Meets any other requirements established by the State Board.
5. To receive the 25 percent of the scholarship money retained
by the State Board pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of NRS
391A.580, a scholarship recipient who meets the requirements set
forth in subsection 4 must request the State Board to disburse the
money within 1 year after the 5-year anniversary of the date on
which the scholarship recipient meets the requirements of
subsection 4.
6. As used in this section, “gift aid” means any grant or
scholarship awarded to a student which is restricted for use only to
pay for tuition, registration fees or other mandatory fees.]
Sec. 23. NRS 391A.590 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.590 1. If a scholarship recipient does not complete the
program for which the scholarship was awarded for any reason,
including, without limitation, withdrawing from the university,
college or other provider of an alternative licensure program or
pursuing another course of study, the university, college or other
provider of an alternative licensure program that awarded the
scholarship must pay to the [State Board] Department for credit to
the Account:
(a) Any amount of money that the university, college or other
provider of an alternative licensure program has received but has not
yet disbursed to the scholarship recipient pursuant to NRS
391A.585; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 43 –
(b) An amount of money equal to the total amount of money
disbursed to the scholarship recipient pursuant to NRS 391A.585 or
$1,000, whichever is less.
2. If a scholarship recipient completes the program for which
the scholarship was awarded on schedule, as described in the
application for the scholarship submitted pursuant to NRS
391A.580, to the extent that money is available for this purpose, the
[State Board] Department shall pay $1,000 to the university, college
or other provider of an alternative licensure program that awarded
the scholarship. Any money received by a university, college or
other provider of an alternative licensure program pursuant to this
section must be used to pay costs associated with providing a
program described in subsection 1 of NRS 391A.580.
Sec. 24. NRS 391A.595 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.595 On or before November 1 of each year, the [State
Board] Department shall:
1. Review all Teach Nevada Scholarships awarded for the
immediately preceding academic year;
2. Compile a report for the immediately preceding academic
year which must include, without limitation:
(a) The number of students who applied for a Teach Nevada
Scholarship;
(b) The number of scholarship recipients;
(c) The total cost of all Teach Nevada Scholarships;
(d) The graduation rate of scholarship recipients;
(e) The percentage of students who:
(1) Were scholarship recipients in the academic year that
immediately precedes the year which is the subject of the report;
(2) Did not graduate by the end of the academic year that
immediately precedes the year which is the subject of the report; and
(3) Received a Nevada Teacher Advancement Scholarship,
as defined in NRS 391A.660, for the academic year which is the
subject of the report; and
(f) The percentage of scholarship recipients who graduated and
became employed as a teacher at a public school in this State; and
(g) The number of scholarship recipients who subsequently
fulfilled the requirements of subsection 4 of NRS 391A.585; and
3. Submit the report compiled pursuant to subsection 2 to the
Governor and the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
distribution to the next regular session of the Legislature.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 44 –
Sec. 24.5. NRS 391A.595 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
391A.595 On or before November 1 of each year, the
Department shall:
1. Review all [Teach Nevada Scholarships] scholarships
awarded pursuant to NRS 391A.585 for the immediately preceding
academic year;
2. Compile a report for the immediately preceding academic
year which must include, without limitation:
(a) The number of students who applied for a [Teach Nevada
Scholarship;] scholarship awarded pursuant to NRS 391A.585;
(b) The number of scholarship recipients;
(c) The total cost of all [Teach Nevada Scholarships;]
scholarships awarded pursuant to NRS 391A.585;
(d) The graduation rate of scholarship recipients;
(e) The percentage of students who:
(1) Were scholarship recipients in the academic year that
immediately precedes the year which is the subject of the report;
and
(2) Did not graduate by the end of the academic year that
immediately precedes the year which is the subject of the report; and
[(3) Received a Nevada Teacher Advancement Scholarship,
as defined in NRS 391A.660, for the academic year which is the
subject of the report; and]
(f) The percentage of scholarship recipients who graduated and
became employed as a teacher at a public school in this State . [; and
(g) The number of scholarship recipients who subsequently
fulfilled the requirements of subsection 4 of NRS 391A.585; and]
3. Submit the report compiled pursuant to subsection 2 to the
Governor and the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
distribution to the next regular session of the Legislature.
Sec. 25. NRS 391A.675 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.675 1. The Nevada Teacher Advancement Scholarship
Program Account is hereby created in the State General Fund. The
Account must be administered by the [State Board.] Department.
2. The interest and income earned on:
(a) The money in the Account, after deducting any applicable
charge; and
(b) Unexpended appropriations made to the Account from the
State General Fund,
 must be credited to the Account.
3. Any money remaining in the Account at the end of a fiscal
year, including, without limitation, any unexpended appropriations
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 45 –
made to the Account from the State General Fund, does not revert to
the State General Fund, and the balance in the Account must be
carried forward to the next fiscal year.
4. The [State Board] Department may accept gifts and grants
of money from any source for deposit in the Account.
5. The money in the Account may only be used to:
(a) Award grants to universities, colleges and other providers of
an alternative licensure program that are approved to award Nevada
Teacher Advancement Scholarships pursuant to NRS 391A.685.
(b) Disburse the money retained pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 2 of NRS 391A.680 to a scholarship recipient who meets
the requirements of subsection 4 of NRS 391A.685.
Sec. 26. NRS 391A.680 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.680 1. A public or private university or college or other
provider of an alternative licensure program in this State is eligible
to apply to the [State Board] Department for a grant from the
Account to award scholarships to students who attend the university,
college or other provider of an alternative licensure program to
complete a program offered by the university, college or other
provider of an alternative licensure program that has been approved
by the [State Board] Commission on Professional Standards in
Education and which [results] :
(a) Results in a certificate of advanced study, master’s or other
degree which is more advanced than a bachelor’s degree , in
education or a related field of study [.] ; or
(b) Upon completion, makes a student eligible to obtain a
license and endorsement to teach in a subject area for which there
is a shortage of teachers, including, without limitation, science,
technology, engineering, mathematics, special education or
English as a second language.
2. The [State Board] Department shall:
(a) Establish the number of Nevada Teacher Advancement
Scholarships that will be available each year based upon the amount
of money available in the Account.
(b) Review all applications submitted pursuant to subsection 1
and award a grant of money from the Account to an approved
university, college or other provider of an alternative licensure
program to the extent that money is available in an amount
determined by the [State Board.] Department. The State Board shall
retain 25 percent of such an award in the Account for disbursement
to a scholarship recipient who meets the requirements of subsection
4 of NRS 391A.685.
3. The [State Board:] Department:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 46 –
(a) Shall prioritize the award of grants from the Account to a
university, college or other provider of an alternative licensure
program that demonstrates the university, college or other provider
of an alternative licensure program will provide scholarships to a
greater number of recipients who:
(1) Received the Teach Nevada Scholarship, as defined in
NRS 391A.570, and successfully fulfilled the requirements of
subsection 4 of NRS 391A.585; or
(2) Are veterans or the spouses of veterans.
(b) May prioritize the award of grants from the Account to a
university, college or other provider of an alternative licensure
program that demonstrates the university, college or other provider
of an alternative licensure program will provide scholarships to a
greater number of recipients who:
(1) Agree to complete the requirements to obtain an
endorsement to teach English as a second language or an
endorsement to teach special education;
(2) Intend to teach in public schools in this State which have
the highest shortage of teachers;
(3) Have been economically disadvantaged or belong to a
racial or ethnic minority group; or
(4) Will be eligible to teach in a subject area for which there
is a shortage of teachers. Such a subject area may include, without
limitation, science, technology, engineering, mathematics, special
education or English as a second language.
4. A student may apply for a Nevada Teacher Advancement
Scholarship from a university, college or other provider of an
alternative licensure program that receives a grant from the Account
only if:
(a) The student attends or has been accepted to attend the
university, college or other provider of an alternative licensure
program to complete a program described in subsection 1; and
(b) The student has taught in a public school in this State for not
less than 2 of the immediately preceding 5 years.
5. An application submitted by the student must identify the
program to be completed and the date by which the student must
complete the program to finish on schedule.
6. The [State Board] Department may adopt any regulations
necessary to carry out the provisions of NRS 391A.650 to
391A.695, inclusive.
Sec. 27. NRS 391A.685 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.685 1. Each university, college or other provider of an
alternative licensure program that is awarded a grant of money from
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 47 –
the Account pursuant to NRS 391A.680 shall use the money to
award Nevada Teacher Advancement Scholarships to students who
will attend the university, college or other provider of an alternative
licensure program with the intent to complete a program described
in subsection 1 of NRS 391A.680. Such students may include,
without limitation, students who have completed a bachelor’s degree
and taught in a public school in this State for at least 2 years.
2. A university, college or other provider of an alternative
licensure program may award a Nevada Teacher Advancement
Scholarship to a scholarship recipient in an amount:
(a) Not to exceed the cost of [receiving] :
(1) Receiving, as applicable, a certificate of advanced study,
master’s degree or other degree which is more advanced than a
bachelor’s degree at a public university in this State prorated over
the number of semesters required for the student to complete the
program; or
(2) A course of study or program which, upon completion,
makes a student eligible to obtain a license and endorsement to
teach in a subject area for which there is a shortage of teachers,
including, without limitation, science, technology, engineering,
mathematics, special education or English as a second language;
and
(b) Equal to the difference between the amount of tuition,
registration fees and other mandatory fees charged to the student for
the program described in subsection 1 of NRS 391A.680, excluding
any amount of the tuition and fees that is waived by the university,
college or other provider of an alternative licensure program, and
the total amount of any other gift aid received by the student.
3. A university, college or other provider of an alternative
licensure program that awards a Nevada Teacher Advancement
Scholarship shall, at the beginning of each semester disburse to the
scholarship recipient 75 percent [the full amount] of the scholarship
money awarded to the scholarship recipient for the semester.
4. A scholarship recipient may only receive the 25 percent of
the scholarship money that is retained by the State Board pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of NRS 391A.680 if the scholarship
recipient:
(a) Completes the program for which he or she was awarded the
scholarship;
(b) Maintains employment as a teacher at a public school in this
State for 3 consecutive school years immediately following
completion of the program unless the State Board waives this
requirement for good cause shown; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 48 –
(c) Meets any other requirements established by the [State
Board.] Department.
5. To receive the 25 percent of the scholarship money retained
by the State Board pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of NRS
391A.680, a scholarship recipient who meets the requirements set
forth in subsection 4 must request the [State Board] Department to
disburse the money within 1 year after the 2-year anniversary of the
date on which the scholarship recipient meets the requirements of
subsection 4.
6. As used in this section, “gift aid” means any grant or
scholarship awarded to a student which is restricted for use only to
pay for tuition, registration fees or other mandatory fees.
Sec. 28. NRS 391A.690 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.690 1. If a scholarship recipient does not complete the
program for which the scholarship was awarded for any reason,
including, without limitation, withdrawing from the university,
college or other provider of an alternative licensure program or
pursuing another course of study, the university, college or other
provider of an alternative licensure program that awarded the
scholarship must pay to the [State Board] Department for credit to
the Account:
(a) Any amount of money that the university, college or other
provider of an alternative licensure program has received but has not
yet disbursed to the scholarship recipient pursuant to NRS
391A.685; and
(b) An amount of money equal to the total amount of money
disbursed to the scholarship recipient pursuant to NRS 391A.685 or
$1,000, whichever is less.
2. If a scholarship recipient completes the program for which
the scholarship was awarded on schedule, as described in the
application for the scholarship submitted pursuant to NRS
391A.680, to the extent that money is available for this purpose, the
[State Board] Department shall pay $1,000 to the university, college
or other provider of an alternative licensure program that awarded
the scholarship. Any money received by a university, college or
other provider of an alternative licensure program pursuant to this
section must be used to pay costs associated with providing a
program described in subsection 1 of NRS 391A.680.
Sec. 29. NRS 391A.695 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.695 On or before November 1 of each year, the [State
Board] Department shall:
1. Review all Nevada Teacher Advancement Scholarships
awarded for the immediately preceding academic year;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 49 –
2. Compile a report for the immediately preceding academic
year which must include, without limitation:
(a) The number of students who applied for a Nevada Teacher
Advancement Scholarship;
(b) The number of scholarship recipients;
(c) The total cost of all Nevada Teacher Advancement
Scholarships;
(d) The graduation rate of scholarship recipients;
(e) The percentage of students who:
(1) Received a Teach Nevada Scholarship, as defined in NRS
391A.570, in the academic year that immediately precedes the year
which is the subject of the report;
(2) Did not graduate by the end of the academic year that
immediately precedes the year which is the subject of the report; and
(3) Were scholarship recipients for the academic year which
is the subject of the report;
(f) The percentage of scholarship recipients who graduated and
became employed as teachers at a public school in this State; and
(g) The number of scholarship recipients who subsequently
fulfilled the requirements of subsection 4 of NRS 391A.685; and
3. Submit the report compiled pursuant to subsection 2 to the
Governor and the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
distribution to the next regular session of the Legislature.
Sec. 29.5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 30. NRS 391A.705 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.705 1. There is hereby created in the Department the
Incentivizing Pathways to Teaching Grant Program to award grants
to public and private universities and colleges in this State that offer
an approved traditional pathway licensure program for the provision
of tuition assistance and stipends to students of such programs who
meet requirements established by the [State Board] Department
pursuant to this section and NRS 391A.710.
2. A public or private university or college in this State that
offers an approved traditional pathway licensure program is eligible
to apply to the [State Board] Department for a grant to award tuition
assistance and stipends to students who attend the university or
college to complete such a program.
3. The [State Board] Department shall:
(a) Based on the amount of money appropriated by the
Legislature for that purpose, establish the number of awards of
tuition assistance and stipends that will be available pursuant to the
Incentivizing Pathways to Teaching Grant Program each year based
upon the amount of money available for the Program.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 50 –
(b) Review all applications submitted pursuant to subsection 2
and, to the extent that money is available within the limits of
legislative appropriations, award a grant of money in an amount
determined by the [State Board] Department to a public or private
university or college that offers an approved traditional pathway
licensure program.
4. The [State Board] Department may prioritize the award of
grants to a public or private university or college that demonstrates
the university or college, as applicable, will provide tuition
assistance and stipends to a greater number of students who:
(a) Are veterans of the Armed Forces of the United States or the
spouses of such veterans;
(b) Intend to teach in public schools in this State which have the
highest shortage of teachers; or
(c) Have been economically disadvantaged or belong to a racial
or ethnic minority group.
5. A student may apply for tuition assistance and a stipend
awarded pursuant to the Incentivizing Pathways to Teaching Grant
Program from a public or private university or college that offers an
approved traditional pathway licensure program that receives a grant
pursuant to the Incentivizing Pathways to Teaching Grant Program
only if:
(a) The student attends or has been accepted to attend an
approved traditional pathway licensure program at the university or
college; and
(b) The student agrees to complete the requirements to obtain an
endorsement to teach English as a second language or an
endorsement to teach special education.
6. An application submitted by the student must identify the
approved traditional pathway licensure program to be completed
and the date by which the student must complete the program to
finish on schedule.
7. The [State Board] Department may adopt any regulations
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section and
NRS 391A.710.
Sec. 31. NRS 391A.710 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.710 1. Each university or college that offers an
approved traditional pathway licensure program in this State that is
awarded a grant of money pursuant to NRS 391A.705 shall use the
money to award tuition assistance and stipends pursuant to the
Incentivizing Pathways to Teaching Grant Program to students who
will attend the university or college with the intent to complete an
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 51 –
approved traditional pathway licensure program. Such students may
include:
(a) Students who are enrolled in their final three semesters of an
approved traditional pathway licensure program; and
(b) Students who are enrolled in their final clinical field
experience of student teaching in an approved traditional pathway
licensure program.
2. A student who is enrolled in his or her final three semesters
of an approved traditional pathway licensure program may apply for
tuition assistance.
3. A student who is enrolled in his or her final clinical field
experience of student teaching in an approved traditional pathway
licensure program may apply for a stipend.
4. The student must:
(a) Agree to:
(1) Complete the approved traditional pathway licensure
program for which he or she was awarded the tuition assistance or
stipend; and
(2) Maintain employment as a teacher at a public school in
this State for 5 consecutive school years immediately following
completion of the program unless the [State Board] Department
waives this requirement for good cause shown.
(b) Meet any other requirements established by the [State
Board.] Department.
Sec. 32. NRS 353.333 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.333 1. On or before [January 1] February 15 of each
year, the Governor shall compile a report on the status of the
finances of the State including the information published in:
(a) The most recent executive budget report prepared pursuant to
the provisions of NRS 353.185;
(b) The most recent report prepared by the State Controller
pursuant to the provisions of NRS 227.110;
(c) The most recent report on the count of state money prepared
pursuant to the provisions of NRS 353.075;
(d) The most recent report on the transactions and proceedings
of the Department of Taxation prepared pursuant to the provisions
of NRS 360.100;
(e) The most recent report prepared by each school district
pursuant to the provisions of NRS 387.303;
(f) The most recent report prepared and submitted by each local
government pursuant to the provisions of NRS 360.220; and
(g) Any other report prepared by the State, or a county, city,
town or school district, or any public agency of this State or its
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 52 –
political subdivisions that the Governor deems to be relevant to the
status of finances of the State.
2. The report required pursuant to subsection 1 must be:
(a) Titled the “Nevada Report to Taxpayers”;
(b) Written in plain English; and
(c) Contain such information as the Governor deems appropriate
to provide a full and accurate description on the status of the
finances of the State, including, without limitation:
(1) The total amount of revenue collected by the State or an
agency of the State during the preceding fiscal year;
(2) The actual total of all expenses and expenditures by the
State or an agency of the State during the preceding fiscal year;
(3) A comparison of the total amount appropriated or
authorized for expenditure by the State during the preceding fiscal
year and the actual total of all expenses and expenditures by the
State during the preceding fiscal year;
(4) The total amount of outstanding public debt of the State
at the end of the preceding fiscal year;
(5) The total cost to pay the public debt of the State during
the preceding fiscal year; and
(6) Such information on the revenue, expenditures and public
debt of the State, or a county, city, town or school district, or any
public agency of this State or its political subdivisions as the
Governor deems necessary to provide a full and accurate description
on the status of the finances of the State.
3. The Governor shall make the report required pursuant to
subsection 1 available for access by the public on the Internet or its
successor, if any.
Secs. 33 and 34. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 35. NRS 387.206, 387.2062 and 391A.205 are hereby
repealed.
Sec. 35.5. NRS 391A.650, 391A.655, 391A.660, 391A.665,
391A.670, 391A.675, 391A.680, 391A.685, 391A.690, 391A.695,
391A.700, 391A.705 and 391A.710 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 35.7. There must be transferred to the Teach Nevada
Scholarship Program Account created by NRS 391A.575:
1. Any money remaining in the Nevada Teacher Advancement
Scholarship Program Account created by NRS 391A.675 on
June 30, 2027.
2. Any money in the budget account for the Incentivizing
Pathways to Teaching Grant Program created by NRS 391A.705
which is not required to revert to the State General Fund at the end
of Fiscal Year 2026-2027.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 53 –
Sec. 36. 1. This section and sections 1 to 19.3, inclusive,
19.7, 20, 21, 23, 24, 25 to 35, inclusive, and 35.7 of this act become
effective on July 1, 2025.
2. Sections 19.5, 20.5, 21.5, 22, 24.5 and 35.5 of this act
become effective on July 1, 2027.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)